Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $57,382,338.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $512,529
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Criminal Justice
Commission.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$7,173,704 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon  Criminal Justice
Commission.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 15, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 2